Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-748
Rules and regulations.

The Chief Water Officer shall adopt and promulgate, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, such rules and regulations as are necessary to the discharge of duties assigned to the Chief Water Officer by the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act.

Laws 1996, LB 108, § 68;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 215;

R.S.Supp.,2002, § 46-656.62;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 88;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 241.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.